Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 12 O.S. 2021, Section 2702,
is amended to read as follows:
Section 2702. If scientific, technical or other
specialized knowledge will assist the trier of fact to
understand the evidence or to determine a fact in issue, a
witness qualified as an expert by knowledge, skill,
experience, training, or education may testify in the form of
an opinion or otherwise, if the proponent demonstrates to the
court that it is more likely than not that:
1. The testimony is based upon sufficient facts or data;
2. The testimony is the product of reliable principles and
methods; and
Req. No. 11341 Page 1

3. The witness has applied expert's opinion reflects a reliable
application of the principles and methods reliably to the facts of
the case.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11341 AQH 12/12/24


















Req. No. 11341 Page 2